sk-SK: Šírka popruhu: Stredný; Špagetový (tenký); Široký; Iné
cs: Šířka popruhu: Střední; Tenký (špagetový); Široký; Jiné
da: Rembredde: Medium; Spaghetti (tynd); Bred; Andet
hu: Pánt szélessége: Közepes; Spagetti (vékony); Széles; Egyéb
fr: Largeur de la sangle: Moyenne; Spaghetti (fine); Large; Autre
vi: Chiều rộng dây đeo: Vừa; Spaghetti (mảnh); Rộng; Khác
de: Gurtbreite: Mittel; Spaghetti (dünn); Breit; Andere
es: Ancho de la correa: Mediano; Espagueti (fino); Ancho; Otro
pt-BR: Tira largura: Médio; Fina (espaguete); Largo; Outro
nb: Stroppbredde: Medium; Spaghetti (tynn); Bred; Annet
sl-SI: Širina traku: Srednje; Špageti (tanko); Široko; Drugo
en: Strap width: Medium; Spaghetti (thin); Wide; Other
el: Πλάτος ιμάντα: Μεσαίο; Spaghetti (λεπτό); Φαρδύ; Άλλο
ro-RO: Lățimea curelei: Medie; Bretea subțire; Lată; Altele
nl: Band breedte: Medium; Spaghetti (dun); Breed; Overig
fi: Hihnan leveys: Keskileveä; Spagetti (ohut); Leveä; Muu
tr: Kayış genişliği: Orta; Spagetti (ince); Geniş; Diğer
sv: Rembredd: Medium; Spagetti (smal); Bred; Övrigt
ko: 스트랩 너비: 보통; 스파게티(얇음); 넓음; 기타
zh-CN: 肩带宽度: 中号; 细带; 宽边; 其他
hr-HR: Širina remena: Srednje; Špageti (tanko); Široko; Ostalo
ru: Ширина ремня: Средняя; Тонкая (спагетти); Широкая; Другое
it: Larghezza degli spallacci: Media; Spaghetto (sottile); Larga; Altro
pt-PT: Largura da correia: Média; Esparguete (fina); Larga; Outro
bg-BG: Ширина на каишката: Средна; Спагети (тънка); Широка; Друго
pl: Szerokość paska: Średni; Cienki jak spaghetti; Szeroki; Inny
lt-LT: Diržo plotis: Vidutinis; „Spaghetti“ (plonas); Platus; Kita
zh-TW: 綁帶寬度: 中; 細肩帶 (細); 寬; 其他
th: ความกว้างของสายสะพาย: ปานกลาง; แบบเส้นสปาเก็ตตี้ (เล็ก); กว้าง; อื่นๆ
ja: ストラップ幅: ミディアム; スパゲッティ (細); ワイド; その他